Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1227
Publicly financed project, defined.

Publicly financed project shall mean any project undertaken by an agency in which any part of the cost is to be paid (1) from funds derived from federal, state, or local taxes of any type, (2) by revenue or general obligation bonds issued by the agency, or (3) from funds derived by the agency from the sale of products or services in a proprietary capacity. Publicly financed project shall not mean a project in which the federal funds involved are in the form of a federal guarantee or insurance.

Laws 1989, LB 254, § 14.